California statutes. Vehicle Code
 shall prevail. Where this chapter is silent, the general driver licensing provisions shall apply. It is the further intent of the Legislature that this program be fee supported, and that the department fully recoup its costs within four years of the program’s enactment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 3.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [15210. - 15210.]

15210.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, as used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Commercial driver’s license” means a driver’s license issued by a state or other jurisdiction, in accordance with the standards contained in Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which authorizes the licenseholder to operate a class or type of commercial motor vehicle.

(b) (1) “Commercial motor vehicle” means any vehicle or combination of vehicles that requires a class A or class B license, or a class C license with an endorsement issued pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section
 15278.

(2) “Commercial motor vehicle” does not include any of the following:

(A) A recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) An implement of husbandry operated by a person who is not required to obtain a driver’s license under this code.

(C) Vehicles operated by persons exempted pursuant to Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code or a vehicle operated in an emergency situation at the direction of a peace officer pursuant to Section 2800.

(c) “Controlled substance” has the same meaning as defined by the federal Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 802).

(d) “Conviction” means
 an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court costs, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.

(e) “Disqualification” means a prohibition against driving a commercial motor vehicle.

(f) “Driving a commercial vehicle under the influence” means committing any one or more of the following unlawful acts in a commercial motor vehicle:

(1) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the operator’s
 blood-alcohol concentration level is 0.04 percent or more, by weight in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 23152.

(2) Driving under the influence of alcohol, as prescribed in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23152.

(3) Refusal to undergo testing as required under this code in the enforcement of Subpart D of Part 383 or Subpart A of Part 392 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) “Employer” means any person, including the United States, a state, or political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle or assigns drivers to operate that vehicle. A person who employs himself or herself as a commercial vehicle driver is considered to be both an employer and a driver for purposes of this chapter.

(h) “Fatality”
 means the death of a person as a result of a motor vehicle accident.

(i) “Felony” means an offense under state or federal law that is punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year.

(j) “Gross combination weight rating” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a combination or articulated vehicle. In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, gross vehicle weight rating shall be determined by adding the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit and the total weight of the towed units and any load thereon.

(k) “Gross vehicle weight rating” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle, as defined in Section 350.

(l) “Imminent hazard”
 means the existence of a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding has begun to lessen the risk of death, illness, injury, or endangerment.

(m) “Noncommercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles that is not included within the definition in subdivision (b).

(n) “Nonresident commercial driver’s license” means a commercial driver’s license issued to an individual by a state under one of the following provisions:

(1) The individual is domiciled in a foreign country.

(2) The individual is domiciled in another
 state.

(o) “Schoolbus” is a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 545.

(p) “Serious traffic violation” includes any of the following:

(1) Excessive speeding, as defined pursuant to the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act (P.L. 99-570) involving any single offense for any speed of 15 miles an hour or more above the posted speed limit.

(2) Reckless driving, as defined pursuant to the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act (P.L. 99-570), and driving in the manner described under Section 2800.1, 2800.2, or 2800.3, including, but not limited to, the offense of driving a commercial motor vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property.

(3) A
 violation of a state or local law involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle, arising in connection with a fatal traffic accident.

(4) A similar violation of a state or local law involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle, as defined pursuant to the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act (Title XII of P.L. 99-570).

(5) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial driver’s license.

(6) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the driver having in his or her possession a commercial driver’s license, unless the driver provides proof at the subsequent court appearance that he or she held a valid commercial driver’s license on the date of the violation.

(7) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when the driver has not met the minimum testing
 standards for that vehicle as to the class or type of cargo the vehicle is carrying.

(8) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while using an electronic wireless communication device to write, send, or read a text-based communication, as defined in Section 23123.5.

In the absence of a federal definition, existing definitions under this code apply.

(q) “State” means a state of the United States or the District of Columbia.

(r) “Tank vehicle” means a commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous material within a tank or tanks having an individual rated capacity of more than 119 gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of at least 1,000 gallons that is permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis, including, but not limited to,
 cargo tanks and portable tanks, as defined in Part 171 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage container tank not designed for transportation, with a rated capacity of at least 1,000 gallons that is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer, is not a tank vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 540.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Driver Notification Requirements [15215. - 15230.]

15215.

(a) The department shall report each conviction of a person who holds a commercial driver’s license from another state occurring within this state to the licensing authority of the home state of the licensee. This report shall clearly identify the person convicted; violation date; describe the violation specifying the section of the statute, code, or ordinance violated; identify the court in which action was taken; indicate whether a plea of guilty or not guilty was entered, or the conviction was a result of the forfeiture of bail, bond, or other security; and include special findings made in connection with the conviction.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “conviction” has the
 same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 15210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 175.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15220.

Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle who has a driver’s license issued by the department, and who is convicted of any offense involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle in any other state, shall notify the department, in the manner provided by the department, of the conviction within 30 days of the date of conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15222.

Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle who is convicted of any offense involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle shall notify his or her employer of the conviction within 30 days of the date of conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 12.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15224.

Any driver who has a driver’s license or privilege suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state for any period, or who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for any period, shall notify his or her employer of the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or disqualification, before the end of the business day following the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15226.

Any driver who is issued an out-of-service order under the federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations of the United States Department of Transportation (49 C.F.R. 392.5) shall report the issuance to his or her employer within 24 hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15228.

The driver shall also report the issuance of an out-of-service order described in Section 15226 to the department in the manner provided by the department within 30 days unless the driver requests a review of the order by the United States Department of Transportation. If so, the driver shall report the order to the department within 30 days of an affirmation of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15230.

Each person who applies for employment as a driver of a commercial motor vehicle shall provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following information for the 10 years preceding the date of application:

(a) A list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle.

(b) The dates the applicant was employed by each employer.

(c) The reason for leaving that employment.

The applicant shall certify that all information furnished is true and complete. An employer may require an applicant to provide additional information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Employer Responsibilities [15240. - 15242.]

15240.

No employer shall knowingly allow, permit, require, or authorize a driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle under any of the following conditions:

(a) The driver has a driver’s license or privilege suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state or has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle.

(b) The driver has more than one driver’s license.

(c) The driver or the commercial motor vehicle or motor carrier operation is subject to an out-of-service order as described in subdivision (b) of Section 2800.

(d) In violation of any law or regulation pertaining to a railroad-highway grade crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15242.

(a) A person who is self-employed as a commercial motor vehicle driver shall comply with both the requirements of this chapter pertaining to employers and those pertaining to employees.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a motor carrier that engages a person who owns, leases, or otherwise operates not more than one motor vehicle listed in Section 34500 to provide transportation services under the direction and control of that motor carrier is responsible for the compliance of that person with this chapter and for purposes of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 34501 during the period of that direction and control.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), “direction and control” means either of the following:

(1) The person is operating under the motor carrier’s interstate operating authority issued by the United States Department of Transportation.

(2) The person is operating under a subcontract with the motor carrier that requires the person to operate in intrastate commerce and the person has performed transportation services for a minimum of 60 calendar days within the past 90 calendar days for the motor carrier and has been on duty for that carrier for no less than 36 hours within any week in which transportation services were provided.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not be construed to change the definition of “employer,” “employee,” or “independent contractor” for any purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 659.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Commercial Driver’s License [15250. - 15263.]

15250.

(a) (1) A person shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle unless that person has in their immediate possession a valid commercial driver’s license of the appropriate class.

(2) A person shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle while transporting hazardous materials unless that person has in their possession a valid commercial driver’s
 license with a hazardous materials endorsement. An instruction permit does not authorize the operation of a vehicle transporting hazardous materials.

(b) (1) Before an application for an original or renewal of a commercial driver’s license with a hazardous materials endorsement is submitted to the United States Transportation Security Administration for the processing of a security threat assessment, as required under Part 1572 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall complete a check of the applicant’s driving record to ensure that the person is not subject to a disqualification under Part 383.51 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) (A) A person shall not be issued a commercial driver’s license until
 passing a knowledge test and driving test for the operation of a commercial motor vehicle that complies with the minimum federal standards established by the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-570) and Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and has satisfied all other requirements of that act as well as any other requirements imposed by this code.

(B) The knowledge test required by Sections 383.23 and 383.25 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the issuance of a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit may be waived for an applicant who is a current or former member of the United States Armed Forces and who meets the conditions and limitations set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 383.77 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as
 those conditions and limitations relate to the waiver of the knowledge test for current or former military service members with experience operating commercial vehicles.

(C) The driving skills test required by Section 383.23 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations
 for the issuance of a commercial driver’s license may be waived for an applicant who is a current or former member of the United States Armed Forces and who meets the conditions
 and limitations set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 383.77 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those conditions and limitations relate to the waiver of the driving skills test for current or former military service members with experience operating commercial vehicles.

(D) The specialized knowledge test required for the issuance of a hazardous materials endorsement to a commercial driver’s license, or a tank vehicle endorsement to a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license, and the driving skills test and specialized knowledge test required for a passenger endorsement to a commercial
 learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license, by Section 383.93 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may be waived for an applicant who is a current or former member of the United States Armed Forces and who meets the conditions and limitations set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 383.77 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those conditions and limitations relate to the waiver of required testing for an endorsement for current or former military service members with experience operating commercial vehicles.

(c) The tests shall be prescribed and conducted by or under the direction of the department. The department may allow a third-party tester to administer the driving test part of the examination required under this section and Section 15275 if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The tests given by the third party
 are the same as those that would otherwise be given by the department.

(2) The third party has an agreement with the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following provisions:

(A) Authorization for the United States Secretary of Transportation, or their representative, and the department, or its representative, to conduct random examinations, inspections, and audits without prior notice.

(B) Permission for the department, or its representative, to conduct onsite inspections at least annually.

(C) A requirement that all third-party testers
 meet the same qualification and training standards as the department’s examiners, to the extent necessary to conduct the driving skill tests in compliance with the requirements of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) The department may cancel, suspend, or revoke the agreement with a third-party tester if the third-party tester fails to comply with the standards for the commercial driver’s license testing program, or with any other term of the third-party agreement, upon 15 days’ prior written notice of the action to cancel, suspend, or revoke the agreement by the department to the third party. Any action to appeal or review any order of the department canceling, suspending, or revoking a third-party testing agreement shall be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction under Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or as otherwise permitted by the laws of this state. The action shall be commenced within 90 days from
 the effective date of the order.

(E) Any third-party tester whose agreement has been canceled pursuant to subparagraph (D) may immediately apply for a third-party testing agreement.

(F) A suspension of a third-party testing agreement pursuant to subparagraph (D) shall be for a term of less than 12 months as determined by the department. After the period of suspension, the agreement shall be reinstated upon request of the third-party tester.

(G) A revocation of a third-party testing agreement pursuant to subparagraph (D) shall be for a term of not less than one year. A third-party tester may apply for a new third-party testing agreement after the period of revocation and upon submission of proof of correction of the circumstances causing the revocation.

(H) Authorization for the department to charge the third-party tester a fee, as determined by the department, that is sufficient to defray the actual costs incurred by the department for administering and evaluating the third-party testing program, and for carrying out any other activities deemed necessary by the department to ensure sufficient training for the drivers participating in the program.

(3) Except as provided in Section 15250.3, the tests given by the third party shall not be accepted in lieu of tests prescribed and conducted by the department for applicants for a passenger vehicle endorsement specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 15278, if the applicant operates or will operate a tour bus.

(d) Commercial driver’s license applicants who take and pass driving tests administered by a third party shall provide the department with
 certificates of driving skill satisfactory to the department that the applicant has successfully passed the driving tests administered by the third party.

(e) If a driving test is administered to a commercial driver’s license applicant who is to be licensed in another state pursuant to Section 383.79 of Subpart E of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department may impose a fee on the applicant that does not exceed the reasonable cost of conducting the tests and reporting the results to the driver’s state of record.

(f) Implementation dates for the issuance of a commercial driver’s license pursuant to this chapter may be established by the department as it determines is necessary to accomplish an orderly commercial driver’s license program.

(g) Active duty members of the United States Armed
 Forces, members of the military reserves, members of the National Guard who are on active duty, including personnel on full-time National Guard duty, personnel on part-time National Guard training, and National Guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military uniforms), and active duty personnel of the United States Coast Guard are exempt from all commercial driver’s license requirements and sanctions, as provided in Section 383.3(c) of Subpart A of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations when operating motor vehicles for military purposes. This exception shall not apply to United States Armed Forces reserve technicians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   (AB 2141)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15250.1.

(a) The department shall, no later than June 5, 2020, adopt regulations related to entry-level driver training requirements for drivers of commercial motor vehicles in compliance with the requirements of Parts 380, 383, and 384 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The department shall require the course of instruction for entry-level drivers to require an applicant for a class A or B commercial driver’s license to complete a minimum of 15 hours of behind-the-wheel training, at least
 10 hours of which shall be on a public road. For the purpose of meeting this requirement, every 50 minutes of driving time is deemed to be an hour of training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 984, Sec. 1.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

15250.3.

The department may allow any employee of an organized camp, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, regulated by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5351) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code to operate a tour bus pursuant to employment by the operator of that organized camp, if that employee satisfies the requirements for a class B license and a passenger vehicle endorsement by passing a test administered by a third party in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 15250.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

15255.1.

(a) Except as otherwise specified in subdivisions (b) and (c), upon an application for an original commercial driver’s license, a fee of sixty-four dollars ($64), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of sixty-six dollars ($66), shall be paid to the department for a license that will expire on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application. A fee of sixty-four dollars ($64), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of sixty-six dollars ($66), shall also be paid to the department upon an application to change a license classification or to remove a restriction if the change or removal requires a driving-skill test and the license will expire on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application.

(b) Upon application for an original commercial driver’s license or for the renewal of commercial driver’s license by a currently licensed class A or class B, or class A or class B, driver who meets the driver record requirements and all other requirements established by Section 383.77 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a fee of thirty-four dollars ($34), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of thirty-nine dollars ($39), shall be paid to the department for a license that will expire on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application.

(c) Upon application for an original class C commercial driver’s license or for the renewal of a class C commercial driver’s license which requires an endorsement as provided in Section 15278, a fee of thirty-four dollars ($34), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of thirty-nine dollars ($39), shall be paid to the department for a license that will expire on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application.

(d) Following failure in taking a driving-skill test, a fee of thirty dollars ($30) shall be paid to the department for each subsequent administration of the driving-skill test required by the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 16.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15255.2.

Upon application for a duplicate commercial driver’s license by a currently licensed class A or class B driver, or a class C commercial driver’s license which requires an endorsement as provided in Section 15278, from an applicant who meets the driver record requirements and all other requirements established by Section 383.77 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a fee of twenty-seven dollars ($27), on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of twenty-nine dollars ($29), shall be paid to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 17.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15260.

(a) Any applicant for a commercial driver’s license who does not successfully complete the air-brake component of the knowledge test, or who does not successfully complete the driving-skill test in a vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with air brakes, shall, if otherwise qualified, receive a commercial driver’s license that restricts the licenseholder from operating a commercial motor vehicle equipped with air brakes.

(b) To remove the restriction described in subdivision (a) from a commercial driver’s license, the driver is required to make a new application for a commercial driver’s license, and, in addition to any other requirements specified in this code, to successfully complete the air-brake component of the knowledge test prescribed by the department, and to pass the driver-skill test in a vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with air brakes.

(c) For the purposes of the driving-skill test and the restriction described in this section, air brakes shall include any braking system operating fully or partially on the air-brake principle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15263.

(a) Any applicant for a commercial driver’s license who successfully completes the driving-skill test in a vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with an automatic transmission, shall, if otherwise qualified, receive a commercial driver’s license that restricts the licenseholder from operating a commercial motor vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with a manual transmission. 

(b) To remove the restriction described in subdivision (a) from a commercial driver’s license, the driver is required to make a new application for a commercial driver’s license, and, in addition to any other requirements specified in this code, successfully complete the driving-skill test in a vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with a manual transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Endorsements [15275. - 15278.]

15275.

(a) A person may not operate a commercial motor vehicle described in this chapter unless that person has in his or her possession a valid commercial driver’s license for the appropriate class, and an endorsement issued by the department to permit the operation of the vehicle unless exempt from the requirement to obtain an endorsement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 15278.

(b) (1) An endorsement to drive vehicles specified in this article shall be issued only to applicants who are qualified by examinations prescribed by the department and who meet the minimum standards established in Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) A hazardous materials endorsement shall be issued only to applicants who comply with paragraph (1) and the requirements set forth in Part 1572 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) The department may deny, suspend, revoke, or cancel an endorsement to drive vehicles specified in this article when the applicant does not meet the qualifications for the issuance or retention of the endorsement.

(d) If the department denies, suspends, revokes, or cancels a hazardous materials endorsement because the department received notification that the applicant poses a security threat pursuant to Part 1572 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and, upon appeal by the United States Transportation Security Administration, that endorsement is ordered reinstated, the department shall issue or restore the hazardous materials endorsement to the applicant within the period specified under those federal regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 201.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15275.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a schoolbus endorsement is valid only when the operator possesses or qualifies for a valid commercial driver’s license with a passenger endorsement and possesses a schoolbus driver’s certificate issued pursuant to Section 12517.

(b) A schoolbus endorsement is valid without a schoolbus driver’s certificate for an operator who is employed as a mechanic or a schoolbus driver-trainee if the schoolbus endorsement is restricted to operating a schoolbus when there is no pupil being transported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 199, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15278.

(a) A driver is required to obtain an endorsement issued by the department to operate any commercial motor vehicle that is any of the following:

(1) A double trailer.

(2) A passenger transportation vehicle, which includes, but is not limited to, a bus, farm labor vehicle, or general public paratransit vehicle when designed, used, or maintained to carry more than 10 persons including the driver.

(3) A schoolbus.

(4) A tank vehicle.

(5) A vehicle carrying hazardous materials, as defined in Section 353, that is required to display placards pursuant to Section 27903, unless the driver is exempt from the endorsement requirement as provided in subdivision (b). This paragraph does not apply to any person operating an implement of husbandry who is not required to obtain a driver’s license under this code.

(b) This section does not apply to any person operating a vehicle in an emergency situation at the direction of a peace officer pursuant to Section 2800.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 360, Sec. 7.   (AB 1648)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Sanctions [15300. - 15326.]

15300.

(a) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one year if the driver is convicted of a first violation of any of the following:

(1) Subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 23152 while operating a motor vehicle.

(2) Subdivision (d) of Section 23152.

(3) Subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23153 while operating a motor vehicle.

(4) Subdivision (d) of Section 23153.

(5) Leaving the scene of an accident
 involving a motor vehicle operated by the driver.

(6) Using a motor vehicle to commit a felony, other than a felony described in Section 15304.

(7) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when the driver’s commercial driver’s license is revoked, suspended, or canceled based on the driver’s operation of a commercial motor vehicle or when the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle based on the driver’s operation of a commercial motor vehicle.

(8) Causing a fatality involving conduct defined pursuant to Section 191.5 of the Penal Code or subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code.

(9) While operating a motor vehicle, refuses to submit to, or fails to complete, a chemical test or tests in violation of Section 23612.

(10) A violation of Section 2800.1, 2800.2, or 2800.3 that involves a commercial motor vehicle.

(b) If a violation listed in subdivision (a), or a violation listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13350 or Section 13352 or 13357, occurred while transporting a hazardous material, the period specified in subdivision (a) shall be three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 4.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15301.

The Department of Motor Vehicles, in conjunction with the State Fire Marshal, shall develop regulations and procedures to temporarily suspend the commercial motor vehicle license of a person who is operating a commercial motor vehicle while transporting dangerous fireworks having a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or more. A driver of a commercial motor vehicle shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for three years if the driver is convicted of transporting dangerous fireworks having a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 563, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15302.

A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for the rest of his or her life if convicted of more than one violation of any of the following:

(a) Subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 23152 while operating a motor vehicle.

(b) Subdivision (d) of Section 23152.

(c) Subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23153 while operating a motor vehicle.

(d) Subdivision (d) of Section 23153.

(e) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle
 operated by the driver.

(f) Using a motor vehicle to commit a felony, other than a felony described in Section 15304.

(g) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when the driver’s commercial driver’s license is revoked, suspended, or canceled based on the driver’s operation of a commercial motor vehicle or when the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle based on the driver’s operation of a commercial motor vehicle.

(h) Causing a fatality involving conduct defined pursuant to Section 191.5 of the Penal Code or in subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code.

(i) While operating a motor vehicle, refuses to submit to, or fails to complete, a chemical test or tests in violation of Section 23612.

(j) A violation of Section 2800.1, 2800.2, or 2800.3 that involves a commercial motor vehicle.

(k) Any combination of the above violations or a violation listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13350 or Section 13352 or 13357 that occurred while transporting a hazardous material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 5.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.

(a) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for the rest of their life if convicted of using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony involving an act or practice of severe forms of human trafficking, as described in Section 7102 of Title 22 of the United States Code.

(b) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for the rest of their life if convicted of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code while using a commercial motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 10.   (AB 3278)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.3.

Pursuant to Subpart E of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle if the department receives notice from the federal Drug and Alcohol Clearinghouse that the driver is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle. The term for which a driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle shall remain in effect for the period specified by Subpart E of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 11.   (AB 3278)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15303.5.

Pursuant to Subpart E of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall not issue, renew, or upgrade a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license if the department receives notification from the federal Drug and Alcohol Clearinghouse that the driver is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 226, Sec. 12.   (AB 3278)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

15304.

(a) A driver may not operate a commercial motor vehicle for the rest of his or her life who uses a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony involving manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance.

(b) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (b).)
-------------------------------------------

15306.

A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 60 days if the person is convicted of a serious traffic violation involving a commercial or a noncommercial motor vehicle and the offense occurred within three years of a separate offense of a serious traffic violation that resulted in a conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 6.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15308.

(a) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 120 days if the person is convicted of a serious traffic violation involving a commercial or noncommercial motor vehicle and the offense occurred within three years of two or more separate offenses of serious traffic violations that resulted in convictions.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13366.5, the time period under subdivision (a) shall not commence until all existing suspensions or revocations of the commercial driving privilege have ended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 7.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------
